Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5948YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 2248 Section 1. Section 812.6, subsection 2, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 3 defendant poses a danger to the public peace or safety, or that 4 the defendant is otherwise not qualified for pretrial release, 5 or the defendant refuses to cooperate with treatment, the 6 court shall commit the defendant to an appropriate inpatient 7 treatment facility as provided in paragraph âaâ , or âbâ , or âcâ . 8 The defendant shall receive mental health treatment designed to 9 restore the defendant to competency. 10 Sec. 2. Section 812.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. (1) A defendant who poses a danger 13 to the public peace or safety and whose competency the court 14 finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, is unlikely to be 15 restored due to a cognitive or neurophysiological disability 16 shall be committed as a safekeeper to the department of 17 corrections at the Iowa medical and classification center, 18 or other appropriate treatment facility as designated by the 19 director. Upon such commitment, a rebuttable presumption 20 exists that the commitment shall continue. The presumption may 21 be rebutted when facts exist to warrant a hearing to determine 22 whether the defendant continues to pose a danger to the public 23 peace or safety. The defendant shall have an annual threat 24 assessment conducted by a qualified expert or professional. 25 Such expert or professional shall be given access to all 26 records concerning the defendant. 27 (2) An annual report shall be prepared by the treatment 28 facility and provided to the court that ordered the commitment. 29 The court shall conduct an annual review and, if warranted, set 30 a hearing on the status of the defendant. 31 (3) The defendant shall remain in placement no longer than 32 the maximum term of confinement for the criminal offense of 33 which the defendant is accused. When the defendantâs placement 34 equals the length of the maximum term of confinement, the 35 -1- LSB 5948YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2248 complaint for the criminal offense of which the defendant is 1 accused shall be dismissed with prejudice. 2